Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1911.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COUNTY GRANTS FOR IMPLEMENTATION OF SERVICE DELIVERY TRANSFORMATION REQUIREMENTS.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for grants to counties to offset county costs related to the implementation of the Department of Human Services' service delivery transformation information technology initiatives. The commissioner must award a grant to each county and develop a formula to distribute grant money in an equitable manner based on the number of persons served by each county human services agency and other factors the commissioner determines to be relevant. The commissioner must also develop a framework to offset county costs for implementation of future information technology or service delivery initiatives in the Department of Human Services or the Department of Children, Youth, and Families. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COUNTY GRANTS FOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for grants to counties for information technology modernization and infrastructure projects. Eligible projects must focus on county development of information technology modernizations to interface with legacy information technology systems within the Department of Human Services and collaborative information technology infrastructure projects between larger and smaller counties. In developing the request for proposals and evaluating county applicants for grants under this section, the commissioner must consult with county associations such as the Minnesota Association of County Social Services Administrators and the Minnesota Counties Computer Cooperative. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin $40,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for improvements to the social services information system. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end